Washington statutes.
RCW 35A.29.120

Ballot titles.

When any question is to be submitted to the voters of a code city, or when a proposition is to be submitted to the voters of an area under provisions of this title, the question or proposition shall be advertised as provided for nominees for office, and in such cases there shall also be printed on the ballot a ballot title for the question or proposition in the form applicable under RCW 82.14.036, 82.46.021, or 82.80.090 or as otherwise expressly required by state law. The ballot title shall be prepared by the attorney for the code city.

[ 2015 c 53 s 55; 1993 c 256 s 13; 1979 ex.s. c 18 s 31; 1967 ex.s. c 119 s 35A.29.120.]

NOTES:

Severability—Effective date—1993 c 256: See notes following RCW 29A.84.280.

Severability—1979 ex.s. c 18: See note following RCW 35A.01.070.